Illinois, session 104th, HB2803.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 19-3, 19-8, 20-2, 20-2.1, 20-2.2, 20-2.3, 20-3, and 620-8 as follows: 7    (10 ILCS 5/19-3)  (from Ch. 46, par. 19-3)8    Sec. 19-3. Application for a vote by mail ballot.9    (a) The application for a vote by mail ballot for a single 10election shall be substantially in the following form:11APPLICATION FOR VOTE BY MAIL BALLOT12    To be voted at the .... election in the County of .... and 13State of Illinois.14    I state that I am a resident of .... in the municipality of 15.... in the county of ....; that I have resided at such address 16for at least 30 days; that I am lawfully entitled to vote at 17the .... election to be held on ....; and that I wish to vote 18by mail.19    I hereby make application for an official ballot or 20ballots to be voted by me at such election, and I agree that I 21shall return such ballot or ballots to the official issuing 22the same prior to the closing of the polls on the date of the 23election or, if returned by mail, received by the election   HB2803- 2 -LRB104 11877 SPS 21968 b1authority before the closing of the polls on postmarked no 2later than election day, for counting no later than during the 3period for counting provisional ballots, the last day of which 4is the 14th day following election day.5    I understand that this application is made for an official 6vote by mail ballot or ballots to be voted by me at the 7election specified in this application and that I must submit 8a separate application for an official vote by mail ballot or 9ballots to be voted by me at any subsequent election. 10    Under penalties as provided by law pursuant to Section 1129-10 of the Election Code, the undersigned certifies that the 12statements set forth in this application are true and correct.13....14*fill in either (1), (2) or (3).15Post office address to which ballot is mailed:16...............17    (a-5) The application for a single vote by mail ballot 18transmitted electronically pursuant to Section 19-2.6 shall be 19substantively similar to the application for a vote by mail 20ballot for a single election and shall include:21        I swear or affirm that I am a voter with a print 22    disability, and, as a result of this disability, I am 23    making a request to receive a vote by mail ballot 24    electronically so that I may privately and independently 25    mark, verify, and print my vote by mail ballot. 26    (b) The application for permanent vote by mail status   HB2803- 3 -LRB104 11877 SPS 21968 b1shall be substantially in the following form:2APPLICATION FOR PERMANENT VOTE BY MAIL STATUS3    I am currently a registered voter and wish to apply for 4permanent vote by mail status.5    I state that I am a resident of .... in the municipality of 6.... in the county of ....; that I have resided at such address 7for at least 30 days; that I am lawfully entitled to vote at 8the .... election to be held on ....; and that I wish to vote 9by mail in:10    ..... all subsequent elections that do not require a party 11        designation. 12    ..... all subsequent elections, and I wish to receive a 13        ................... Party vote by mail ballot in 14        elections that require a party designation.15    I hereby make application for an official ballot or 16ballots to be voted by me at such election, and I agree that I 17shall return such ballot or ballots to the official issuing 18the same prior to the closing of the polls on the date of the 19election or, if returned by mail, received by the election 20authority before the closing of the polls on postmarked no 21later than election day, for counting no later than during the 22period for counting provisional ballots, the last day of which 23is the 14th day following election day.24    Under penalties as provided by law under Section 29-10 of 25the Election Code, the undersigned certifies that the 26statements set forth in this application are true and correct.  HB2803- 4 -LRB104 11877 SPS 21968 b1.... 2Post office address to which ballot is mailed:3...............4    (b-5) The application for permanent vote by mail ballots 5transmitted electronically pursuant to Section 19-2.6 shall be 6substantively similar to the application for permanent vote by 7mail status and shall include: 8        I swear or affirm that I am a voter with a 9    non-temporary print disability, and as a result of this 10    disability, I am making a request to receive vote by mail 11    ballots electronically so that I may privately and 12    independently mark, verify, and print my vote by mail 13    ballots. 14    (c) However, if application is made for a primary election 15ballot, such application shall require the applicant to 16designate the name of the political party with which the 17applicant is affiliated. The election authority shall allow 18any voter on permanent vote by mail status to change his or her 19party affiliation for a primary election ballot by a method 20and deadline published and selected by the election authority. 21    (d) If application is made electronically, the applicant 22shall mark the box associated with the above described 23statement included as part of the online application 24certifying that the statements set forth in the application 25under subsection (a) or (b) are true and correct, and a 26signature is not required.   HB2803- 5 -LRB104 11877 SPS 21968 b1    (e) Any person may produce, reproduce, distribute, or 2return to an election authority an application under this 3Section. If applications are sent to a post office box 4controlled by any individual or organization that is not an 5election authority, those applications shall (i) include a 6valid and current phone number for the individual or 7organization controlling the post office box and (ii) be 8turned over to the appropriate election authority within 7 9days of receipt or, if received within 2 weeks of the election 10in which an applicant intends to vote, within 2 days of 11receipt. Failure to turn over the applications in compliance 12with this paragraph shall constitute a violation of this Code 13and shall be punishable as a petty offense with a fine of $100 14per application. Removing, tampering with, or otherwise 15knowingly making the postmark on the application unreadable by 16the election authority shall establish a rebuttable 17presumption of a violation of this paragraph. Upon receipt, 18the appropriate election authority shall accept and promptly 19process any application under this Section submitted in a form 20substantially similar to that required by this Section, 21including any substantially similar production or reproduction 22generated by the applicant.23    (f) An election authority may combine the applications in 24subsections (a) and (b) onto one form, but the distinction 25between the applications must be clear and the form must 26provide check boxes for an applicant to indicate whether he or   HB2803- 6 -LRB104 11877 SPS 21968 b1she is applying for a single election vote by mail ballot or 2for permanent vote by mail status. 3(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21; 102-819, eff. 5-13-22; 4103-467, eff. 8-4-23.) 5    (10 ILCS 5/19-8)  (from Ch. 46, par. 19-8)6    Sec. 19-8. Time and place of counting ballots.7    (a) (Blank.)8    (b) Each vote by mail voter's ballot returned to an 9election authority, by any means authorized by this Article, 10and received by that election authority before the closing of 11the polls on election day shall be endorsed by the receiving 12election authority with the day and hour of receipt and may be 13processed by the election authority beginning on the day it is 14received by the election authority in the central ballot 15counting location of the election authority, but the results 16of the processing may not be counted until the day of the 17election after 7:00 p.m., except as provided in subsections 18(g) and (g-5). 19    (c) Each vote by mail voter's ballot that is mailed to an 20election authority and postmarked no later than election day, 21but that is received by the election authority after the polls 22close on election day shall not be counted and before the close 23of the period for counting provisional ballots cast at that 24election, shall be endorsed by the receiving authority with 25the day and hour of receipt and shall be counted at the central   HB2803- 7 -LRB104 11877 SPS 21968 b1ballot counting location of the election authority during the 2period for counting provisional ballots.3    Each vote by mail voter's ballot that is mailed to an 4election authority absent a postmark or a barcode usable with 5an intelligent mail barcode tracking system, but that is 6received by the election authority after the polls close on 7election day and before the close of the period for counting 8provisional ballots cast at that election, shall be endorsed 9by the receiving authority with the day and hour of receipt, 10opened to inspect the date inserted on the certification, and, 11if the certification date is election day or earlier and the 12ballot is otherwise found to be valid under the requirements 13of this Section, counted at the central ballot counting 14location of the election authority during the period for 15counting provisional ballots. Absent a date on the 16certification, the ballot shall not be counted.17    If an election authority is using an intelligent mail 18barcode tracking system, a ballot that is mailed to an 19election authority absent a postmark may be counted if the 20intelligent mail barcode tracking system verifies the envelope 21was received by the election authority before the closing of 22the polls on mailed no later than election day.23    (d) Special write-in vote by mail voter's blank ballots 24returned to an election authority, by any means authorized by 25this Article, and received by the election authority at any 26time before the closing of the polls on election day shall be   HB2803- 8 -LRB104 11877 SPS 21968 b1endorsed by the receiving election authority with the day and 2hour of receipt and shall be counted at the central ballot 3counting location of the election authority during the same 4period provided for counting vote by mail voters' ballots 5under subsections (b), (g), and (g-5). Special write-in vote 6by mail voter's blank ballots that are mailed to an election 7authority and postmarked no later than election day, but that 8are received by the election authority after the polls close 9on election day and before the closing of the period for 10counting provisional ballots cast at that election, shall be 11endorsed by the receiving authority with the day and hour of 12receipt and shall be counted at the central ballot counting 13location of the election authority during the same periods 14provided for counting vote by mail voters' ballots under 15subsection (c).16    (e) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, vote by 17mail voters' ballots and special write-in vote by mail voter's 18blank ballots received by the election authority after the 19closing of the polls on an election day shall be endorsed by 20the election authority receiving them with the day and hour of 21receipt and shall be safely kept unopened by the election 22authority for the period of time required for the preservation 23of ballots used at the election, and shall then, without being 24opened, be destroyed in like manner as the used ballots of that 25election.26    (f) Counting required under this Section to begin on   HB2803- 9 -LRB104 11877 SPS 21968 b1election day after the closing of the polls shall commence no 2later than 8:00 p.m. and shall be conducted by a panel or 3panels of election judges appointed in the manner provided by 4law. The counting shall continue until all vote by mail 5voters' ballots and special write-in vote by mail voter's 6blank ballots required to be counted on election day have been 7counted.8    (g) The procedures set forth in Articles 17 and 18 of this 9Code shall apply to all ballots counted under this Section. In 10addition, within 2 days after a vote by mail ballot is 11received, but in all cases before the close of the period for 12counting provisional ballots, the election judge or official 13shall compare the voter's signature on the certification 14envelope of that vote by mail ballot with the voter's 15signature on the application verified in accordance with 16Section 19-4 or the signature of the voter on file in the 17office of the election authority. If the election judge or 18official determines that the 2 signatures match, and that the 19vote by mail voter is otherwise qualified to cast a vote by 20mail ballot, the election authority shall cast and count the 21ballot on election day or the day the ballot is determined to 22be valid, whichever is later, adding the results to the 23precinct in which the voter is registered. If the election 24judge or official determines that the signatures do not match, 25or that the vote by mail voter is not qualified to cast a vote 26by mail ballot, then without opening the certification   HB2803- 10 -LRB104 11877 SPS 21968 b1envelope, the judge or official shall mark across the face of 2the certification envelope the word "Rejected" and shall not 3cast or count the ballot.4    In addition to the voter's signatures not matching, a vote 5by mail ballot may be rejected by the election judge or 6official:7        (1) if the ballot envelope is open or has been opened 8    and resealed;9        (2) if the voter has already cast an early or grace 10    period ballot;11        (3) if the voter voted in person on election day or the 12    voter is not a duly registered voter in the precinct; or13        (4) on any other basis set forth in this Code.14    If the election judge or official determines that any of 15these reasons apply, the judge or official shall mark across 16the face of the certification envelope the word "Rejected" and 17shall not cast or count the ballot. 18    (g-5) If a vote by mail ballot is rejected by the election 19judge or official for any reason, the election authority 20shall, within 2 days after the rejection but in all cases 21before the close of the period for counting provisional 22ballots, notify the vote by mail voter that his or her ballot 23was rejected. The notice shall inform the voter of the reason 24or reasons the ballot was rejected and shall state that the 25voter may appear before the election authority, on or before 26the 14th day after the election, to show cause as to why the   HB2803- 11 -LRB104 11877 SPS 21968 b1ballot should not be rejected. The voter may present evidence 2to the election authority supporting his or her contention 3that the ballot should be counted. The election authority 4shall appoint a panel of 3 election judges to review the 5contested ballot, application, and certification envelope, as 6well as any evidence submitted by the vote by mail voter. No 7more than 2 election judges on the reviewing panel shall be of 8the same political party. The reviewing panel of election 9judges shall make a final determination as to the validity of 10the contested vote by mail ballot. The judges' determination 11shall not be reviewable either administratively or judicially.12    A vote by mail ballot subject to this subsection that is 13determined to be valid shall be counted before the close of the 14period for counting provisional ballots. 15    If a vote by mail ballot is rejected for any reason, the 16election authority shall, within one day after the rejection, 17transmit to the State Board of Elections by electronic means 18the voter's name, street address, email address and precinct, 19ward, township, and district numbers, as the case may be. If a 20rejected vote by mail ballot is determined to be valid, the 21election authority shall, within one day after the 22determination, remove the name of the voter from the list 23transmitted to the State Board of Elections. The State Board 24of Elections shall maintain the names and information in an 25electronic format on its website accessible to State and local 26political committees.  HB2803- 12 -LRB104 11877 SPS 21968 b1    Upon request by the State or local political committee, 2each election authority shall, within one day after the 3request, provide the following information about all rejected 4vote by mail ballots: voter's name, street address, email 5address and precinct, ward, township, and district numbers, as 6the case may be. 7    (g-10) All vote by mail ballots determined to be valid 8shall be added to the vote totals for the precincts for which 9they were cast in the order in which the ballots were opened. 10    (h) Each political party, candidate, and qualified civic 11organization shall be entitled to have present one pollwatcher 12for each panel of election judges therein assigned. 13(Source: P.A. 102-1126, eff. 2-10-23; 103-467, eff. 8-4-23.) 14    (10 ILCS 5/20-2)  (from Ch. 46, par. 20-2)15    Sec. 20-2. Any member of the United States Service, 16otherwise qualified to vote, who expects in the course of his 17duties to be absent from the county in which he resides on the 18day of holding any election may make application for a vote by 19mail ballot to the election authority having jurisdiction over 20his precinct of residence on the official postcard or on a form 21furnished by the election authority as prescribed by Section 2220-3 of this Article not less than 10 days before the election. 23A request pursuant to this Section shall entitle the applicant 24to a vote by mail ballot for every election in one calendar 25year. The original application for ballot shall be kept in the   HB2803- 13 -LRB104 11877 SPS 21968 b1office of the election authority for one year as authorization 2to send a ballot to the voter for each election to be held 3within that calendar year. A certified copy of such 4application for ballot shall be sent each election with the 5vote by mail ballot to the election authority's central ballot 6counting location to be used in lieu of the original 7application for ballot. No registration shall be required in 8order to vote pursuant to this Section.9    Ballots under this Section shall be mailed by the election 10authority in the manner prescribed by Section 20-5 of this 11Article and not otherwise. Ballots voted under this Section 12must be received by the election authority before the closing 13of the polls on returned postmarked no later than election day 14and received for counting at the central ballot counting 15location of the election authority during the period for 16counting provisional ballots, the last day of which is the 1714th day following election day.18(Source: P.A. 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15; 99-522, eff. 6-30-16.) 19    (10 ILCS 5/20-2.1)  (from Ch. 46, par. 20-2.1)20    Sec. 20-2.1. Citizens of the United States temporarily 21residing outside the territorial limits of the United States 22who are not registered but otherwise qualified to vote and who 23expect to be absent from their county of residence during the 24periods of voter registration provided for in Articles 4, 5 or 256 of this Code and on the day of holding any election, may make   HB2803- 14 -LRB104 11877 SPS 21968 b1simultaneous application to the election authority having 2jurisdiction over their precinct of residence for registration 3by mail and vote by mail ballot not less than 30 days before 4the election. Such application may be made on the official 5postcard or on a form furnished by the election authority as 6prescribed by Section 20-3 of this Article or by facsimile or 7electronic transmission. A request pursuant to this Section 8shall entitle the applicant to a vote by mail ballot for every 9election in one calendar year. The original application for 10ballot shall be kept in the office of the election authority 11for one year as authorization to send a ballot to the voter for 12each election to be held within that calendar year. A 13certified copy of such application for ballot shall be sent 14each election with the vote by mail ballot to the election 15authority's central ballot counting location to be used in 16lieu of the original application for ballot.17    Registration shall be required in order to vote pursuant 18to this Section. However, if the election authority receives 19one of such applications after 30 days but not less than 10 20days before a Federal election, said applicant shall be sent a 21ballot containing the Federal offices only and registration 22for that election shall be waived.23    Ballots under this Section shall be delivered by the 24election authority in the manner prescribed by Section 20-5 of 25this Article in person, by mail, or, if requested by the 26applicant and the election authority has the capability, by   HB2803- 15 -LRB104 11877 SPS 21968 b1facsimile transmission or by electronic transmission.2    Ballots voted under this Section must be received by the 3election authority before the closing of the polls on returned 4postmarked no later than election day and received for 5counting at the central ballot counting location of the 6election authority during the period for counting provisional 7ballots, the last day of which is the 14th day following 8election day. 9(Source: P.A. 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15; 99-522, eff. 6-30-16.) 10    (10 ILCS 5/20-2.2)  (from Ch. 46, par. 20-2.2)11    Sec. 20-2.2. Any non-resident civilian citizen, otherwise 12qualified to vote, may make application to the election 13authority having jurisdiction over his precinct of former 14residence for a vote by mail ballot containing the Federal 15offices only not less than 10 days before a Federal election. 16Such application may be made on the official postcard or by 17facsimile or electronic transmission. A request pursuant to 18this Section shall entitle the applicant to a vote by mail 19ballot for every election in one calendar year at which 20Federal offices are filled. The original application for 21ballot shall be kept in the office of the election authority 22for one year as authorization to send a ballot to the voter for 23each election to be held within that calendar year at which 24Federal offices are filled. A certified copy of such 25application for ballot shall be sent each election with the   HB2803- 16 -LRB104 11877 SPS 21968 b1vote by mail ballot to the election authority's central ballot 2counting location to be used in lieu of the original 3application for ballot. No registration shall be required in 4order to vote pursuant to this Section. Ballots under this 5Section shall be delivered by the election authority in the 6manner prescribed by Section 20-5 of this Article in person, 7by mail, or, if requested by the applicant and the election 8authority has the capability, by facsimile transmission or by 9electronic transmission. Ballots voted under this Section must 10be received by the election authority before the closing of 11the polls on returned postmarked no later than election day 12and received for counting at the central ballot counting 13location of the election authority during the period for 14counting provisional ballots, the last day of which is the 1514th day following election day.16(Source: P.A. 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15; 99-522, eff. 6-30-16.) 17    (10 ILCS 5/20-2.3)  (from Ch. 46, par. 20-2.3)18    Sec. 20-2.3. Members of the Armed Forces and their spouses 19and dependents. Any member of the United States Armed Forces 20while on active duty, and his or her spouse and dependents, 21otherwise qualified to vote, who expects in the course of his 22or her duties to be absent from the county in which he or she 23resides on the day of holding any election, in addition to any 24other method of making application for vote by mail ballot 25under this Article, may make application for a vote by mail   HB2803- 17 -LRB104 11877 SPS 21968 b1ballot to the election authority having jurisdiction over his 2or her precinct of residence by a facsimile machine or 3electronic transmission not less than 10 days before the 4election.5    Ballots under this Section shall be delivered by the 6election authority in the manner prescribed by Section 20-5 of 7this Article in person, by mail, or, if requested by the 8applicant and the election authority has the capability, by 9facsimile transmission or by electronic transmission. Ballots 10voted under this Section must be returned postmarked no later 11than election day and received for counting at the central 12ballot counting location of the election authority no later 13than during the period for counting provisional ballots, the 14last day of which is the 7th 14th day following election day.15(Source: P.A. 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15; 99-522, eff. 6-30-16.) 16    (10 ILCS 5/20-3)  (from Ch. 46, par. 20-3)17    Sec. 20-3. The election authority shall furnish the 18following applications for registration by mail or vote by 19mail ballot which shall be considered a method of application 20in lieu of the official postcard.21    1. Members of the United States Service and citizens of 22the United States temporarily residing outside the territorial 23limits of the United States may make application within the 24periods prescribed in Sections 20-2 or 20-2.1, as the case may 25be. Such application shall be substantially in the following   HB2803- 18 -LRB104 11877 SPS 21968 b1form:2"APPLICATION FOR BALLOT3    To be voted at the ............ election in the precinct 4in which is located my residence at ..............., in the 5city/village/township of ............(insert home address) 6County of ........... and State of Illinois.7    I state that I am a citizen of the United States; that on 8(insert date of election) I shall have resided in the State of 9Illinois and in the election precinct for 30 days; that on the 10above date I shall be the age of 18 years or above; that I am 11lawfully entitled to vote in such precinct at that election; 12that I am (check category 1, 2, or 3 below):13    1.  ( ) a member of the United States Service,14    2.  ( ) a citizen of the United States temporarily 15residing outside the territorial limits of the United States 16and that I expect to be absent from the said county of my 17residence on the date of holding such election, and that I will 18have no opportunity to vote in person on that day.19    I hereby make application for an official ballot or 20ballots to be voted by me at such election if I am absent from 21the said county of my residence, and I agree that I shall 22return said ballot or ballots to the election authority 23postmarked no later than the closing of the polls on election 24day, for counting no later than during the period for counting 25provisional ballots, the last day of which is the 14th day 26following election day or shall destroy said ballot or   HB2803- 19 -LRB104 11877 SPS 21968 b1ballots.2    (Check below only if category 2 and not previously 3registered)4    ( ) I hereby make application to become registered as a 5voter and agree to return the forms and affidavits for 6registration to the election authority not later than 30 days 7before the election.8    Under penalties as provided by law pursuant to Article 29 9of the Election Code, the undersigned certifies that the 10statements set forth in this application are true and correct.11.........................12    Post office address or service address to which 13registration materials or ballot should be mailed14.........................15.........................16.........................17........................"18    If application is made for a primary election ballot, such 19application shall designate the name of the political party 20with which the applicant is affiliated.21    Such applications may be obtained from the election 22authority having jurisdiction over the person's precinct of 23residence.24    2. A spouse or dependent of a member of the United States 25Service, said spouse or dependent being a registered voter in 26the county, may make application on behalf of said person in   HB2803- 20 -LRB104 11877 SPS 21968 b1the office of the election authority within the periods 2prescribed in Section 20-2 which shall be substantially in the 3following form:4"APPLICATION FOR BALLOT to be voted at the........... election 5in the precinct in which is located the residence of the person 6for whom this application is made at.............(insert 7residence address) in the city/village/township of......... 8County of.......... and State of Illinois.9    I certify that the following named person................ 10(insert name of person) is a member of the United States 11Service.12    I state that said person is a citizen of the United States; 13that on (insert date of election) said person shall have 14resided in the State of Illinois and in the election precinct 15for which this application is made for 30 days; that on the 16above date said person shall be the age of 18 years or above; 17that said person is lawfully entitled to vote in such precinct 18at that election; that said person is a member of the United 19States Service, and that in the course of his duties said 20person expects to be absent from his county of residence on the 21date of holding such election, and that said person will have 22no opportunity to vote in person on that day.23    I hereby make application for an official ballot or 24ballots to be voted by said person at such election and said 25person agrees that he shall return said ballot or ballots to 26the election authority postmarked no later than the closing of   HB2803- 21 -LRB104 11877 SPS 21968 b1the polls on election day, for counting no later than during 2the period for counting provisional ballots, the last day of 3which is the 14th day following election day, or shall destroy 4said ballot or ballots.5    I hereby certify that I am the (mother, father, sister, 6brother, husband or wife) of the said elector, and that I am a 7registered voter in the election precinct for which this 8application is made. (Strike all but one that is applicable.)9    Under penalties as provided by law pursuant to Article 29 10of The Election Code, the undersigned certifies that the 11statements set forth in this application are true and correct.12Name of applicant ......................13Residence address ........................14City/village/township........................15    Service address to which ballot should be mailed:16.........................17.........................18.........................19........................"20    If application is made for a primary election ballot, such 21application shall designate the name of the political party 22with which the person for whom application is made is 23affiliated.24    Such applications may be obtained from the election 25authority having jurisdiction over the voting precinct in 26which the person for whom application is made is entitled to   HB2803- 22 -LRB104 11877 SPS 21968 b1vote.2(Source: P.A. 101-270, eff. 1-1-21; 102-292, eff. 1-1-22.)  3    (10 ILCS 5/20-8)  (from Ch. 46, par. 20-8)4    Sec. 20-8. Time and place of counting ballots.5    (a) (Blank.)6    (b) Each vote by mail voter's ballot returned to an 7election authority, by any means authorized by this Article, 8and received by that election authority may be processed by 9the election authority beginning on the day it is received by 10the election authority in the central ballot counting location 11of the election authority, but the results of the processing 12may not be counted until the day of the election after 7:00 13p.m., except as provided in subsections (g) and (g-5). 14    (c) Each vote by mail voter's ballot that is mailed to an 15election authority and postmarked no later than election day, 16but that is received by the election authority after the polls 17close on election day shall not be counted and before the close 18of the period for counting provisional ballots cast at that 19election, shall be endorsed by the receiving authority with 20the day and hour of receipt and shall be counted at the central 21ballot counting location of the election authority during the 22period for counting provisional ballots.23    Each vote by mail voter's ballot that is mailed to an 24election authority absent a postmark or a barcode usable with 25an intelligent mail barcode tracking system, but that is   HB2803- 23 -LRB104 11877 SPS 21968 b1received by the election authority after the polls close on 2election day and before the close of the period for counting 3provisional ballots cast at that election, shall be endorsed 4by the receiving authority with the day and hour of receipt, 5opened to inspect the date inserted on the certification, and, 6if the certification date is election day or earlier and the 7ballot is otherwise found to be valid under the requirements 8of this Section, counted at the central ballot counting 9location of the election authority during the period for 10counting provisional ballots. Absent a date on the 11certification, the ballot shall not be counted.12    If an election authority is using an intelligent mail 13barcode tracking system, a ballot that is mailed to an 14election authority absent a postmark may be counted if the 15intelligent mail barcode tracking system verifies the envelope 16was received by the election authority before the closing of 17the polls on mailed no later than election day. 18    (d) Special write-in vote by mail voter's blank ballots 19returned to an election authority, by any means authorized by 20this Article, and received by the election authority at any 21time before the closing of the polls on election day shall be 22endorsed by the receiving election authority with the day and 23hour of receipt and shall be counted at the central ballot 24counting location of the election authority during the same 25period provided for counting vote by mail voters' ballots 26under subsections (b), (g), and (g-5). Special write-in vote   HB2803- 24 -LRB104 11877 SPS 21968 b1by mail voter's blank ballot that are mailed to an election 2authority and postmarked no later than election day, but that 3are received by the election authority after the polls close 4on election day and before the closing of the period for 5counting provisional ballots cast at that election, shall be 6endorsed by the receiving authority with the day and hour of 7receipt and shall be counted at the central ballot counting 8location of the election authority during the same periods 9provided for counting vote by mail voters' ballots under 10subsection (c). 11    (e) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, vote by 12mail voters' ballots and special write-in vote by mail voter's 13blank ballots received by the election authority after the 14closing of the polls on the day of election shall be endorsed 15by the person receiving the ballots with the day and hour of 16receipt and shall be safely kept unopened by the election 17authority for the period of time required for the preservation 18of ballots used at the election, and shall then, without being 19opened, be destroyed in like manner as the used ballots of that 20election.21    (f) Counting required under this Section to begin on 22election day after the closing of the polls shall commence no 23later than 8:00 p.m. and shall be conducted by a panel or 24panels of election judges appointed in the manner provided by 25law. The counting shall continue until all vote by mail 26voters' ballots and special write-in vote by mail voter's   HB2803- 25 -LRB104 11877 SPS 21968 b1blank ballots required to be counted on election day have been 2counted.3    (g) The procedures set forth in Articles 17 and 18 of this 4Code shall apply to all ballots counted under this Section. In 5addition, within 2 days after a ballot subject to this Article 6is received, but in all cases before the close of the period 7for counting provisional ballots, the election judge or 8official shall compare the voter's signature on the 9certification envelope of that ballot with the signature of 10the voter on file in the office of the election authority. If 11the election judge or official determines that the 2 12signatures match, and that the voter is otherwise qualified to 13cast a ballot under this Article, the election authority shall 14cast and count the ballot on election day or the day the ballot 15is determined to be valid, whichever is later, adding the 16results to the precinct in which the voter is registered. If 17the election judge or official determines that the signatures 18do not match, or that the voter is not qualified to cast a 19ballot under this Article, then without opening the 20certification envelope, the judge or official shall mark 21across the face of the certification envelope the word 22"Rejected" and shall not cast or count the ballot.23    In addition to the voter's signatures not matching, a 24ballot subject to this Article may be rejected by the election 25judge or official:26        (1) if the ballot envelope is open or has been opened   HB2803- 26 -LRB104 11877 SPS 21968 b1    and resealed;2        (2) if the voter has already cast an early or grace 3    period ballot;4        (3) if the voter voted in person on election day or the 5    voter is not a duly registered voter in the precinct; or6        (4) on any other basis set forth in this Code.7    If the election judge or official determines that any of 8these reasons apply, the judge or official shall mark across 9the face of the certification envelope the word "Rejected" and 10shall not cast or count the ballot.11    (g-5) If a ballot subject to this Article is rejected by 12the election judge or official for any reason, the election 13authority shall, within 2 days after the rejection but in all 14cases before the close of the period for counting provisional 15ballots, notify the voter that his or her ballot was rejected. 16The notice shall inform the voter of the reason or reasons the 17ballot was rejected and shall state that the voter may appear 18before the election authority, on or before the 14th day after 19the election, to show cause as to why the ballot should not be 20rejected. The voter may present evidence to the election 21authority supporting his or her contention that the ballot 22should be counted. The election authority shall appoint a 23panel of 3 election judges to review the contested ballot, 24application, and certification envelope, as well as any 25evidence submitted by the vote by mail voter. No more than 2 26election judges on the reviewing panel shall be of the same   HB2803- 27 -LRB104 11877 SPS 21968 b1political party. The reviewing panel of election judges shall 2make a final determination as to the validity of the contested 3ballot. The judges' determination shall not be reviewable 4either administratively or judicially.5    A ballot subject to this subsection that is determined to 6be valid shall be counted before the close of the period for 7counting provisional ballots.8    (g-10) All ballots determined to be valid shall be added 9to the vote totals for the precincts for which they were cast 10in the order in which the ballots were opened. 11    (h) Each political party, candidate, and qualified civic 12organization shall be entitled to have present one pollwatcher 13for each panel of election judges therein assigned.14(Source: P.A. 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15; 99-522, eff. 6-30-16.) 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.